Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-925
Cleaning project; ditch or watercourse; state highway; contract with Department of Transportation.

Where the cleaning of a ditch or watercourse involves a state highway, the county board is authorized to make any contract with the Department of Transportation with reference to bridges or culverts or, if unable to agree therein, to bring any action necessary to force the state to participate in such improvement.

Laws 1959, c. 132, § 25, p. 492;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 82.